Idaho statutes. TITLE 33 EDUCATION
CHAPTER 52 PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOLS
33-5209C. Enforcement — Revocation — Appeal.

An authorized chartering entity shall continually monitor the performance and legal compliance of the public charter schools it oversees, including collecting and analyzing data to support ongoing evaluation according to the performance certificate. Every authorized chartering entity shall have the authority to conduct or require oversight activities that enable the authorized chartering entity to fulfill its responsibilities pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, including conducting appropriate inquiries and investigations, as long as those activities are consistent with the intent of this chapter, adhere to the terms of the performance certificate and do not unduly inhibit the autonomy granted to public charter schools.

Each authorized chartering entity shall annually publish and make available to the public a performance report for each public charter school it oversees, in accordance with the performance framework set forth in the performance certificate and section 33-5209A, Idaho Code. The authorized chartering entity may require each public charter school it oversees to submit an annual report to assist the authorized chartering entity in gathering complete information about each school consistent with the performance framework. Each public charter school shall publish its annual performance report on the school’s website.

If an authorized chartering entity has reason to believe that a public charter school cannot remain fiscally sound for the remainder of its certificate term, it shall provide the state department of education with written notification of such concern. Upon receiving such notification, the state department of education shall have the authority to modify the percentage of the total appropriation to be paid to the public charter school pursuant to the provisions of section 33-1009(1), Idaho Code, such that equal percentages are paid on each of the prescribed dates. If documents filed with an authorized chartering entity pursuant to section 33-5206(7), Idaho Code, establish that a public charter school that is not a virtual school and that has been open for more than two (2) years had less than fifteen (15) days’ worth of cash on hand on June 30 of the current calendar year, then by November 30 of that year the authorized chartering entity shall notify the school that the school has until June 30 of the subsequent year to cure the deficiency. If on June 30 of the subsequent year the school again has less than fifteen (15) days’ worth of cash on hand, then by November 30 of that year the authorized chartering entity shall begin revocation proceedings pursuant to subsection (7) of this section.

If an authorized chartering entity has reason to believe that a charter holder or public charter school has violated any provision of law, it shall notify the charter holder and the entity responsible for administering said law of the possible violation.

If an authorized chartering entity revokes or does not renew a charter, the authorized chartering entity shall clearly state, in a resolution of its governing board, the reasons for the revocation or nonrenewal.

Within fourteen (14) days of taking action to renew, not renew or revoke a charter, the authorized chartering entity shall report to the state board of education the action taken and shall provide a copy of the report to the charter holder at the same time that the report is submitted to the state board of education. The report shall include a copy of the authorized chartering entity’s resolution setting forth the action taken and reasons for the decision and assurances as to compliance with all of the requirements set forth in this chapter.
(7) A charter may be revoked by the authorized chartering entity if the public charter school has failed to meet any of the specific, written conditions for necessary improvements established pursuant to the provisions of section 33-5209B(1), Idaho Code, or has failed to cure the fifteen (15) days’ worth of cash on hand deficiency pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, by the dates specified. Revocation may not occur until the charter holder has been afforded a public hearing, unless the authorized chartering entity determines that the continued operation of the public charter school presents an imminent public safety issue, in which case the charter may be revoked immediately. Public hearings shall be conducted by the authorized chartering entity or such other person or persons appointed by the authorized chartering entity to conduct public hearings and receive evidence as a contested case in accordance with the provisions of section 67-5242, Idaho Code. Notice and opportunity to reply shall include, at a minimum, written notice setting out the basis for consideration of revocation, a period of not less than thirty (30) days within which the charter holder can reply in writing, and a public hearing within thirty (30) days of the receipt of the written reply.

(8) A decision to revoke or nonrenew a charter or to deny a revision of a charter may be appealed directly to the state board of education. With respect to such appeal, the state board of education shall substantially follow the procedure as provided in section 33-5207(5) (b), Idaho Code. In the event the state board of education reverses a decision of revocation or nonrenewal, the charter holder subject to such action shall then be placed under the chartering authority of the public charter school commission.

33-5210. Application of school law — Accountability — Exemption from state rules.

All public charter schools are under the general supervision of the state board of education.

Every authorized chartering entity that approves a charter shall be responsible for ensuring that each public charter school program approved by that authorized chartering entity meets the terms of the charter, complies with the general education laws of the state unless specifically directed otherwise in this chapter, and operates in accordance with the state educational standards of thoroughness pursuant to section 33-1612, Idaho Code.

Each public charter school shall comply with the financial reporting requirements of section 33-701, subsections 5. through 10., Idaho Code, in the same manner as those requirements are imposed upon school districts and with laws governing safety including, but not limited to, sections 33-122 and 33-130, Idaho Code, and chapter 2, title 33, Idaho Code, and rules promulgated thereunder.

Other than as specified in this section, each public charter school is exempt from rules governing school districts, which rules have been promulgated by the state board of education, with the exception of state rules relating to:

Teacher certification as necessitated by the provisions of section 33-5206(3) and (4), Idaho Code;

Accreditation of the school as necessitated by the provisions of section 33-5206(12), Idaho Code;

Qualifications of a student for attendance at an alternative school as necessitated by the provisions of section 33-5208(3), Idaho Code;

Rules promulgated pursuant to section 33-1612, Idaho Code; and

All rules that specifically pertain to public charter schools promulgated by the state board of education.

33-5211. Technical support and information.

Upon request, the state department of education shall provide technical assistance to persons or authorized chartering entities preparing or reviewing charter petitions or performance certificates, and to existing public charter schools in the same manner as such assistance is provided to traditional public schools and school districts.

Upon request, the state department of education shall provide the following information concerning a public charter school whose petition has been approved:

The public charter school’s charter and performance certificate;

The annual audit performed at the public charter school pursuant to the public charter school petition; and

Any written report by the state board of education to the legislature reviewing the educational effectiveness of public charter schools.

At least one (1) person among a group of petitioners of a prospective public charter school shall attend, in person or electronically, a public charter school workshop offered by the state department of education. The state department of education shall provide notice of dates and locations when workshops will be held, shall make earlier recorded workshops available electronically and shall provide proof of attendance to workshop attendees.

33-5212. School closure and dissolution.

Prior to any public charter school closure decision, an authorized chartering entity shall have developed a public charter school closure protocol to ensure timely notification to parents, orderly transition of students and student records to new schools, and proper disposition of school funds, property and assets in accordance with the requirements of this chapter. The protocol shall specify tasks, timelines and responsible parties, including delineating the respective duties of the school and the authorized chartering entity. In the event of a public charter school closure for any reason, the authorized chartering entity shall oversee and work with the closing school to ensure a smooth and orderly closure and transition for students and parents, as guided by the closure protocol. The closing school’s board of directors shall be responsible for executing the school’s closure.

In the event of a public charter school closure for any reason, the assets of the school shall be distributed first to satisfy outstanding payroll obligations for employees of the school, including any tax, public employee retirement system and other employee benefit obligations, then to creditors of the school, and then to the authorized chartering entity in the case of a public charter school authorized by the board of a local school district. In the case of a public charter school authorized by any other authorized chartering entity, any remaining assets shall be distributed to the public school income fund. Assets purchased using federal funds shall be returned to the authorized chartering entity for redistribution among other public charter schools. If the assets of the school are insufficient to pay all parties to whom the school owes compensation, the prioritization of the distribution of assets may be determined by decree of a court of law.

33-5213. Public charter school commission.

There is hereby created an independent public charter school commission, referred to hereinafter as the commission, to be located in the office of the state board of education, pursuant to section 33-105, Idaho Code. It shall be the responsibility and duty of the executive director of the state board of education, or his designee, acting at the direction of the commission to administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter, and the director or his designee shall serve as secretary to the commission.

The public charter school commission shall adopt policies, subject to law, regarding the governance and administration of the commission and make recommendations to the state board of education regarding the oversight of public charter schools.

The commission shall be composed of seven (7) members:

Three (3) members shall be appointed by the governor, subject to the advice and consent of the senate;

Two (2) members shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; and

Two (2) members shall be appointed by the president pro tempore of the senate.

The term of office for commission members shall be four (4) years. In making such appointments, the appointing authorities shall consider regional balance. Members appointed to the commission shall collectively possess strong experience and expertise in public and nonprofit governance, management and finance, public school leadership, assessment, curriculum and instruction and public education law. All members of the commission shall have demonstrated understanding of and commitment to charter schools as a strategy for strengthening public education. Members of the commission shall hold office until the expiration of the term to which the member was appointed and until a successor has been duly appointed, unless sooner removed for cause by the appointing authority. Whenever a vacancy occurs, the appointing authority shall appoint a qualified person to fill the vacancy for the unexpired portion of the term.

All members of the commission shall be citizens of the United States and residents of the state of Idaho for not less than two (2) years.

The members of the commission shall, at their first regular meeting following the effective date of this act, and every two (2) years thereafter, elect, by a majority vote of the members of the commission, a chairman and a vice-chairman. The chairman shall preside at meetings of the commission, and the vice-chairman shall preside at such meetings in the absence of the chairman. A majority of the members of the commission shall constitute a quorum. The commission shall meet at such times and places as determined to be necessary and convenient, or at the call of the chair.
(7) Each member of the commission not otherwise compensated by public moneys shall be compensated as provided in section 59-509(h), Idaho Code.

Commissioner appointments made pursuant to this section prior to July 1, 2013, shall remain valid through the duration of the term to which each commissioner was appointed. To establish a transition to the appointing authority structure contained in this subsection, the first four (4) appointments available on or after July 1, 2013, shall be made in an alternating sequence for each appointment by the speaker of the house of representatives, the president pro tempore of the senate, and the governor. Notwithstanding this sequence of appointments, at no time may any appointing authority appoint more members of the commission than permitted under this subsection. Subsequent appointments shall be made by the same appointing authority that originally appointed the commissioner whose term expired.

33-5214. Public charter school authorizers fund.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a fund to be known as the “Public Charter School Authorizers Fund,” hereinafter referred to as “the fund.” All authorizer fees paid pursuant to section 33-5208(8), Idaho Code, for public charter schools under the governance of the public charter school commission shall be deposited in the fund. Moneys in the fund shall be appropriated to defray the commission’s cost of operations and the state department of education’s cost of reviewing, approving and overseeing any charter school authorizers requiring department approval.

33-5215. Career technical regional public charter school.

A career technical regional public charter school is hereby declared to be a public charter school and as such, the provisions of chapter 52, title 33, Idaho Code, shall apply to each career technical regional public charter school in the same manner and to the same extent as the provisions of charter school law apply to other public charter schools, with the exception of certain conditions and applications as specifically provided in this section.

In addition to the approval provisions of this chapter, approval of a career technical regional public charter school by an authorized chartering entity shall not be final until the petition has also been reviewed by the division of career technical education.

Funding for a career technical regional public charter school shall be the same as provided in section 33-5208, Idaho Code, except that:

The salary-based apportionment for a career technical regional public charter school shall be the statewide average for public charter schools. Such salary-based apportionment may be used for payment of contracted services or for direct hire of staff;

The board of directors may contract for the services of certificated and noncertificated personnel, to procure the use of facilities and equipment, and to purchase materials and equipment, which in the judgment of the board of directors is necessary or desirable for the conduct of the business of the career technical regional public charter school; and

Transportation support shall be paid to the career technical regional public charter school in accordance with the provisions of chapter 15, title 33, Idaho Code.

A career technical regional public charter school shall provide assurances in state attendance reports that it has verified attendance reports, which generate ADA with its participating school districts, to make certain that the districts and the charter school do not duplicate enrollment or ADA claims.

33-5216. Public postsecondary institutions

Public charter high schools. [Null and void.]

Null and void, pursuant to rejection of Proposition 3 on November 6, 2012.

33-5217. Public charter school debt reserve.

There is hereby created the public charter school debt reserve to assist qualifying charter schools in obtaining favorable financing for facility improvements and construction. A public charter school seeking to use the public charter school debt reserve must receive approval from the Idaho housing and finance association pursuant to the criteria set forth in this section.

A public charter school shall be qualified to use the public charter school debt reserve only upon satisfaction of the following conditions:

The public charter school must demonstrate it has obtained one (1) of the following:

A letter of commitment from a national or state chartered financial institution;

A letter of commitment from a nonprofit corporation;

A letter of commitment from a community development financial institution; or

A letter of commitment from a qualified underwriter or an investment firm;

The public charter school must provide annual budgets and cash flow statements and must demonstrate satisfaction of each of the following criteria:

Projected future budgets, cash flows and operating reserves greater than sixty (60) days of cash on hand to support a debt service coverage greater than 1.20x;

Cost to operate facility, including debt service, occupancy cost and operating expenses, not to exceed twenty percent (20%) of revenue;

Audited financial statements with unqualified opinions for the prior three (3) years; and

Certification from a school administrator that projected future budgets and cash flows are based on reasonable assumptions related to level or increasing projected enrollment or waitlist and projected total income, including any matching funds and donations contingent on receipt of a loan under this section; and

The public charter school must obtain approval for issuance by the Idaho housing and finance association to act as a conduit issuer.

Public charter schools that satisfy the requirements set forth in subsection (2) of this section shall receive approval from the Idaho housing and finance association to rely on the public charter school debt reserve for assistance in obtaining favorable financing for facility improvements and construction, so long as sufficient moneys exist pursuant to subsection (4) of this section. Eligible schools shall receive approval on a first-come basis according to date of completed application, in an amount not to exceed twenty-four (24) months of principal and interest payments.

There is hereby established in the state treasury the public charter school debt reserve fund that shall consist of moneys made available through appropriations, fees, grants, gifts or any other source to fulfill the purposes of this section. Moneys in the fund are hereby continuously appropriated for the purposes of this section, and shall only be expended for the purposes stated herein. Qualifying schools annually shall pay an amount equal to ten (10) basis points of the principal amount of the debt for which it qualified to use the public charter school debt reserve, which shall be deposited into the public charter school debt reserve fund.

Subject to the limitations of subsection (3) of this section, if a qualified public charter school defaults on an outstanding debt for which the Idaho housing and finance association has made the debt reserve available, and there is no other money available to the charter school to make the payment, money shall be withdrawn from the public charter school debt reserve fund to pay the principal, redemption price or interest on the outstanding debt. Upon certification by the Idaho housing and finance association to the superintendent of public instruction, payment shall be made from the public charter school debt reserve fund toward the outstanding debt.
(6) If money has been withdrawn from the public charter school debt reserve fund for a public charter school pursuant to subsection (5) of this section, then the superintendent of public instruction shall redirect the money from such public charter school’s allocation of facilities funds pursuant to section 33-5208(5), Idaho Code. Any money redirected shall be according to a determined time and sequence of payments, over a period of years until the amount so withdrawn has been repaid to the fund so long as the redirection does not cause an event of default under the agreement(s) governing the public charter school’s obligation for which the debt reserve was made available, excepting that any money withdrawn during any fiscal year shall be repaid within ten (10) years.

33-5218. Public charter school facilities program.

Legislative intent. It is the intent of the legislature, in recognition that providing Idaho students with a thorough education is an essential public purpose of the state, to support public charter schools by providing a mechanism to obtain favorable financing on bonds so that less money is obligated toward interest payments and more money remains in public charter schools for the benefit of Idaho’s students. There is hereby created the public charter school facilities program to assist qualifying charter schools in obtaining favorable financing on bonds for facility improvements and construction.

Eligibility. A public charter school seeking to use the public charter school facilities program must receive approval from the Idaho housing and finance association pursuant to requirements for issuance of nonprofit facility bonds and to satisfaction of the criteria set forth in this section. To qualify, a public charter school must submit the following documentation to the Idaho housing and finance association:

A letter of commitment from one (1) of the following:

A national or state chartered financial institution;

A community development financial institution; or

A qualified underwriter or an investment firm;

Evidence that the public charter school has been in academic, operational, and financial good standing according to its authorizer for each of the previous three (3) years;

Annual budgets and cash flow statements projecting that the cost to operate the proposed facility, including future debt service, future occupancy cost, and facility operating expenses, will not exceed twenty percent (20%) of ongoing revenues;

Evidence that the school has operating reserves greater than sixty (60) days of cash on hand and a debt service coverage ratio equal to or greater than one and two-tenths (1.2);

An audit opinion or opinions demonstrating:

An unqualified audit opinion, or a qualified opinion qualified only on the basis of not reporting the actuarial value of the PERSI sick leave plan pursuant to statement no. 45 of the governmental accounting standards board;

An audit devoid of significant findings and conditions, material weakness, or significant internal control weakness; and

An audit that does not include a going concern disclosure in the notes or an explanatory paragraph within the audit report for three (3) consecutive years;

Certification from a public charter school’s board chair or treasurer that projected future budgets and cash flows are based on reasonable assumptions related to level or increasing projected enrollment or waitlist and projected total income, including any matching funds and donations contingent on receipt of a loan under this section;

Evidence of strong academic results, including above state average growth or proficiency on the Idaho standards achievement test; and

Any additional information requested by the Idaho housing and finance association.

Approval to participate. Upon receipt of documentation satisfying the criteria set forth in subsection (2) of this section, the Idaho housing and finance association shall notify the public charter school and the state treasurer that the school has been approved to participate in the public charter school facilities program if:
(a) The public charter school complies with the requirements set forth in subsection (4) of this section; and

Restricted debt service reserve account.

A school participating in the public charter school facilities program shall agree to have deposited a minimum of twelve (12) months’ payment on principal and interest in a restricted debt service reserve account established and held by the bondholder or trustee.

Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection, money in a participating public charter school’s restricted debt service reserve account may not be withdrawn if the amount withdrawn would reduce the level of money in the account to less than twelve (12) months’ payment on principal and interest.

As long as applicable bonds issued under the facilities program remain outstanding, money in a restricted debt service reserve account may be withdrawn in an amount that would reduce the level to less than twelve (12) months’ payment on principal and interest, if the money is withdrawn for the purpose of:

Paying the principal, redemption price, or interest on a bond when due if the state payments intercepted pursuant to subsection (5) of this section, plus funded grants and other revenues pledged by the participating public charter school for payment of the bond, are insufficient to make the payment; or

Paying any redemption premium required to be paid when the bonds are redeemed prior to maturity if no bonds will remain outstanding.

Within ten (10) days following the withdrawal from the restricted debt service account, the bond holder or trustee shall notify the Idaho housing and finance association, the state treasurer, and the state controller of the shortfall in the school’s restricted debt service reserve account.

Within fifteen (15) days of the notice provided pursuant to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the controller shall transfer, from the public charter school facilities program fund set forth in subsection (6) of this section, to the public school income fund and then to the school’s restricted debt service reserve account an amount equal to one (1) month’s interest on the bonds based on the interest payments for which the draw on the restricted debt service reserve account occurred. Moneys transferred to the public school income fund pursuant to this subparagraph shall be continuously appropriated for such purposes.

By December 1 of each year, the treasurer shall submit to the governor a letter certifying the amount, if any, required to restore amounts on deposit in the restricted debt service reserve accounts of participating public charter schools and the public charter school facilities program fund. The governor shall send to the legislature a statement of the expenditure of moneys from the public charter school facilities program fund as specified in section 8, article IV of the Idaho constitution and report the amount needed to restore funds in the restricted debt service reserve accounts to the amount required in subsection (4)(b) of this section. The legislature may appropriate money to restore amounts on deposit in the restricted debt service reserve account of a defaulting public charter school to the amounts required in subsection (4)(b) of this section or to redeem all outstanding bonds issued for a defaulting public charter school, the source of which may be the public charter school facilities program fund or any other available funds. The legislature may also appropriate money to restore amounts withdrawn from the public charter school facilities program fund.

Intercept. As a requirement to participate in the public charter school facilities program, a participating public charter school shall provide a directive to the Idaho department of education that all payments to the school pursuant to the state educational support program shall be paid directly to the bond trustee to set aside funds in accordance with the bond indenture. All remaining funds shall be forwarded to the public charter school. The payment directive required in this subsection may not be revoked or amended.

Public charter school facilities program fund. There is hereby established in the state treasury the public charter school facilities program fund, which shall consist of moneys made available through appropriations, fees, grants, gifts, or any other source to fulfill the purposes of this section. Moneys in the fund are hereby continuously appropriated for the purposes of this section and shall only be expended for the purposes stated herein. Any interest earned on the investment of idle moneys in the public charter school facilities program fund shall be returned to the public charter school facilities program fund. Schools participating in the public charter school facilities program shall pay a onetime fee in an amount equal to one-half percent (0.5%) of par at the time of issuance and an annual fee in an amount equal to seventy-five thousandths percent (0.075%) on the outstanding balance, which shall be deposited in the public charter school facilities program fund.

Nonpayment.

If a public charter school participating in the public charter school facilities program has defaulted on its obligation to pay, a draw on its restricted debt service reserve account shall be made, then the following shall occur:
(i) The bond trustee shall exercise its remedies under the bond indenture and loan agreement.

Repayment. If money has been withdrawn from the public charter school facilities program fund pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection, the school shall repay the fund from the school’s allocation of facilities funds pursuant to section 33-5208(5), Idaho Code, at a time agreed to by the superintendent of public instruction over a period of years until the amount so withdrawn has been repaid to the public charter school facilities program fund, as long as the repayment does not cause an event of default on a facility lease or loan.

Limitations.

Bonds issued for the benefit of public charter schools using the public charter school facilities program shall not be indebtedness of the state, but are special obligations payable solely from:

Revenues or other funds pledged by the qualifying public charter school; and

Amounts appropriated by the legislature pursuant to subsection (7) of this section.

The Idaho housing and finance association may not use the public charter school facilities program when issuing bonds for a public charter school under the facilities program if the total par amount outstanding under the facilities program, plus the par amount of the bonds to be issued, would exceed the percentage of all Idaho public school students attending public charter schools multiplied by the par amount of the bonds guaranteed under the Idaho school bond guaranty act.

(b) The public charter school’s participation would not cause a violation of the limitations set forth in subsection (8) of this section.

Additional requirements and security interests may be imposed by agreement of the school and bondholder or trustee.